trunk/incubator/apertium-sh-sl.sl.dix
    <pardef n="star/i__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>i<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="stari"><i>star</i><par n="star/i__adj"/></e>
